District of Columbia statutes.
38-2303

Supervision.

The Secretary of Education is charged with the supervision of public business relating to Gallaudet University.

R.S., § 441
Mar. 4, 1911, 36 Stat. 1422, ch. 285
1940 Reorg. Plan No. IV,§ 11
1953 Reorg. Plan No. 1
June 18, 1954, 68 Stat. 265, ch. 324, § 1
1981 Ed., § 31-1803.
1973 Ed., § 31-1022.

“Gallaudet University” was substituted for “Gallaudet College” pursuant to § 38-2401.01. “Gallaudet College” had previously been substituted for “Columbia Institution for the Deaf” at the end of this section, pursuant to former § 38-2305.

“Secretary of Education” was substituted for “Secretary of Health, Education and Welfare” near the beginning of this section, pursuant to § 301 of the Act of October 17, 1979, 93 Stat. 677, Pub. L. 96-88.